Illinois, session 104th, HB2343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 5Program Act is amended by changing Section 145 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 130/145)7    Sec. 145. Confidentiality. 8    (a) The following information received and records kept by 9the Department of Public Health, Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation, Department of Agriculture, or 11Illinois State Police for purposes of administering this Act 12are subject to all applicable federal privacy laws, 13confidential, and exempt from the Freedom of Information Act, 14and not subject to disclosure to any individual or public or 15private entity, except as necessary for authorized employees 16of those authorized agencies to perform official duties under 17this Act and the following information received and records 18kept by Department of Public Health, Department of 19Agriculture, Department of Financial and Professional 20Regulation, and Illinois State Police, excluding any existing 21or non-existing Illinois or national criminal history record 22information as defined in subsection (d), may be disclosed to 23each other upon request:   HB2343- 2 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1        (1) Applications and renewals, their contents, and 2    supporting information submitted by qualifying patients 3    and designated caregivers, including information regarding 4    their designated caregivers and certifying health care 5    professionals. 6        (2) Applications and renewals, their contents, and 7    supporting information submitted by or on behalf of 8    cultivation centers and dispensing organizations in 9    compliance with this Act, including their physical 10    addresses. This does not preclude the release of ownership 11    information of cannabis business establishment licenses. 12        (3) The individual names and other information 13    identifying persons to whom the Department of Public 14    Health has issued registry identification cards. 15        (4) Any dispensing information required to be kept 16    under Section 135, Section 150, or Department of Public 17    Health, Department of Agriculture, or Department of 18    Financial and Professional Regulation rules shall identify 19    cardholders and registered cultivation centers by their 20    registry identification numbers and medical cannabis 21    dispensing organizations by their registration number and 22    not contain names or other personally identifying 23    information. 24        (5) All medical records provided to the Department of 25    Public Health in connection with an application for a 26    registry card.   HB2343- 3 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    (b) Nothing in this Section precludes the following: 2        (1) Department of Agriculture, Department of Financial 3    and Professional Regulation, or Public Health employees 4    may notify law enforcement about falsified or fraudulent 5    information submitted to the Departments if the employee 6    who suspects that falsified or fraudulent information has 7    been submitted conferred with his or her supervisor and 8    both agree that circumstances exist that warrant 9    reporting. 10        (2) If the employee conferred with his or her 11    supervisor and both agree that circumstances exist that 12    warrant reporting, Department of Public Health employees 13    may notify the Department of Financial and Professional 14    Regulation if there is reasonable cause to believe a 15    certifying health care professional: 16            (A) issued a written certification without a bona 17        fide health care professional-patient relationship 18        under this Act; 19            (B) issued a written certification to a person who 20        was not under the certifying health care 21        professional's care for the debilitating medical 22        condition; or 23            (C) failed to abide by the acceptable and 24        prevailing standard of care when evaluating a 25        patient's medical condition. 26        (3) The Department of Public Health, Department of   HB2343- 4 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    Agriculture, and Department of Financial and Professional 2    Regulation may notify State or local law enforcement about 3    apparent criminal violations of this Act if the employee 4    who suspects the offense has conferred with his or her 5    supervisor and both agree that circumstances exist that 6    warrant reporting. 7        (4) Medical cannabis cultivation center agents and 8    medical cannabis dispensing organizations may notify the 9    Department of Public Health, Department of Financial and 10    Professional Regulation, or Department of Agriculture of a 11    suspected violation or attempted violation of this Act or 12    the rules issued under it. 13        (5) Each Department may verify registry identification 14    cards under Section 150. 15        (6) The submission of the report to the General 16    Assembly under Section 160. 17    (b-5) Each Department responsible for licensure under this 18Act shall publish on the Department's website a list of the 19ownership information of cannabis business establishment 20licensees under the Department's jurisdiction. The list shall 21include, but shall not be limited to, the name of the person or 22entity holding each cannabis business establishment license 23and the address at which the entity is operating under this 24Act. This list shall be published and updated monthly. 25    (c) Except for any ownership information released pursuant 26to subsection (b-5) or as otherwise authorized or required by   HB2343- 5 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1law, it is a Class B misdemeanor with a $1,000 fine for any 2person, including an employee or official of the Department of 3Public Health, Department of Financial and Professional 4Regulation, or Department of Agriculture or another State 5agency or local government, to breach the confidentiality of 6information obtained under this Act. 7    (d) The Department of Public Health, the Department of 8Agriculture, the Illinois State Police, and the Department of 9Financial and Professional Regulation shall not share or 10disclose any existing or non-existing Illinois or national 11criminal history record information. For the purposes of this 12Section, "any existing or non-existing Illinois or national 13criminal history record information" means any Illinois or 14national criminal history record information, including but 15not limited to the lack of or non-existence of these records. 16    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 17the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 18the Department of Agriculture may share with the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity any licensee information 20necessary to support the administration of social equity 21programming. 22(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 23102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 24    Section 10. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 25by changing Sections 1-10, 7-10, 7-15, and 55-30 as follows:   HB2343- 6 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)2    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 4issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 5to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 6administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.7    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 8license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 9Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 10organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 11in furtherance of this Act.12    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 13including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and 14electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution 15of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the 16display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not 17mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed 18cannabis business establishment. 19    "Application points" means the number of points a 20Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 21Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 22    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 23States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 24certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 25Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion,   HB2343- 7 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 2Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 3Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 4nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 5area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 6Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 7    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 8or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 9Applicants.10    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 11that are identified as including any parts of the plant 12Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 13as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 14the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the 15plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, 16mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin, 17including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally 18produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or 19indirectly by extraction; however, "cannabis" does not include 20the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the 21stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other 22compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 23preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 24from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 25plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 26include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the   HB2343- 8 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 2concentrate, and cannabis-infused products.3    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 4center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 5organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 6organization.7    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 8cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, 9including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 10the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 11other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 12propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 13use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 14of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 15it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.16    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable, 17traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of 18containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during 19transportation.20    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 21substances that are identified as including any parts of the 22plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 23such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 24kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 25from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 26salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its   HB2343- 9 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1seeds, or resin.2    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 3ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 4containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 5intended to be smoked.6    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 7materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 8cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing, 9processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 10repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 11otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 12    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 13system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 14testing and data collection established and maintained by the 15cultivation center, craft grower, or processing organization 16and that is available to the Department of Revenue, the 17Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State Police for the 19purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and monitoring 20plant development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis 21plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer from seed 22planting to final packaging.23    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 24the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 25contaminants.26    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant   HB2343- 10 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 2propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 3plant.4    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 5Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 6age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 7is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 8provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an 9Illinois Community College.10    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 11Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 12document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 13identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 14Training Pilot Program faculty participant.15    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 16means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult 17Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to 18an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant 19meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 20entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 21or cannabis-infused products.22    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 23license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 24Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 25Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 26conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by   HB2343- 11 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 2processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.3    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 4organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 5Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 6perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 7for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 8organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square 9feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 10flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 11an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 12in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 13need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 14compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 15square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage, 16which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed 17and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a 18processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both, 19provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 20cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 21the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 22sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 23    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 24member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 25years of age or older.26    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document   HB2343- 12 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 2person as a craft grower agent.3    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 4organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 5Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 6limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 7to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 8business establishments.9    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 10board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 11who is 21 years of age or older.12    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 13document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 14identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.15    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.16    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing 17organization at which activities licensed by this Act may 18occur.19    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 20Organization Name as stated on an application for a 21Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 22    "Dispensing organization" means a facility operated by an 23organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 24Financial and Professional Regulation to acquire cannabis from 25a cultivation center, craft grower, processing organization, 26or another dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing   HB2343- 13 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1cannabis, cannabis-infused products, cannabis seeds, 2paraphernalia, or related supplies under this Act to 3purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 4patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 5organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 6organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 7Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act that has obtained an 8Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License.9    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 10employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 11years of age or older.12    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 13a document issued by the Department of Financial and 14Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 15dispensing organization agent.16    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 17comparable geographic area that satisfies the following 18criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and 19Economic Opportunity, that: 20        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 21            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 22        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 23            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 24        participate in the federal free lunch program 25        according to reported statistics from the State Board 26        of Education; or   HB2343- 14 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 2        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 3        Assistance Program; or4            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 5        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 6        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 7        unemployment average, as determined by the United 8        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2 9        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 10        application; and 11        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 12    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 13    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.14    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 15means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 16center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 17Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 18begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless 19otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 20cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 21establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 22Act as of January 1, 2020.23    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 24means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 25organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 26Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to   HB2343- 15 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 2purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.3    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 4secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 5cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 6Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 7effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or 8cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this 9Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 10its existing registered medical dispensary location.11    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 12eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 13available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 14Applicant Lottery. 15    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 16building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 17security devices that permit access only by cannabis business 18establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis 19business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 20cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.21    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 22building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 23security devices that permit access only by authorized 24individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 25include:26        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is   HB2343- 16 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 2    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 3    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 4    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 5    different from any key or code that can be used to access 6    the residential building from the exterior; or7        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that 8    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building 9    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 10    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 11    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 12    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 13    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 14    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 15organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 16Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies, 17subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations. 18    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and 19when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 20for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:21        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 22    internode of the plant; or23        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 24    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 25    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 26    from the moment the light deprivation began through the   HB2343- 17 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.2    "Individual" means a natural person.3    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 4operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 5the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 6or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 7a cannabis-infused product. 8    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are 9found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 10higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 11pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 12    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 13cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 14recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 15in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 16labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, 17work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference 18with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 19that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 20disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 21communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 22cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 23shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 24reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 25establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 26with employees to discuss their right to representation,   HB2343- 18 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 2employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 3particular method of election or certification of the bona 4fide labor organization.5    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 6control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 7this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales 8occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing 9organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 10or service professionals conducting business with the 11dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 12patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 13Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 14the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 15permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 16caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot 17Program participants. 18    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 19a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 20a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 21of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 22delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 23under this Act.24    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 25or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 26will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an   HB2343- 19 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1infuser or dispensing organization.2    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 3normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 4from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 5from within an adjacent property. 6    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 7the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and 8control over the management and day-to-day operations of the 9business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 10and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 11ownership.12    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 13association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 14private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 15executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 16by order of any court.17    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under 18Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 1921 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 20medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 21Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.22    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 23establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 24establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 25of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 26interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a   HB2343- 20 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 2treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 3with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 4arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 5to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 6assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 7establishment and who is further defined in this Act.8    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person 9usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 10be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 11address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 12Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 13Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 14more than one primary residence.15    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 16operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 17the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent 18chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 19incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 20formulation to produce a cannabis product. 21    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 22board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.23    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 24a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 25identifies a person as a processing organization agent.26    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who   HB2343- 21 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 2does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 3Medical Cannabis Program Act.4    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted 5an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 6least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 715-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 8of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.9    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 10means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 11Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 12points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 13score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 14the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 15this Section. 16    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity 17Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under 18this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.19    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 20located within the relevant geographic area as established by 212 of the following:22        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 23    applicant's name;24        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 25    name;26        (3) school records;  HB2343- 22 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1        (4) a voter registration card;2        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 3    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 4    Disability Identification Card;5        (6) a paycheck stub; 6        (7) a utility bill; 7        (8) tax records; or8        (9) any other proof of residency or other information 9    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.10    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 11combustion of cannabis.12    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 13Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:14        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 15    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 16    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately 17    Impacted Area; 18        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 19    control by one or more individuals who: 20            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 21        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 22        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 23            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;24        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 25    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 26    employees who:  HB2343- 23 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately 2        Impacted Area; or3            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 4        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 5        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 6        an impacted family.7    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 8the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for 9Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 10employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 11offenses, unless otherwise required by law.12    "Social Equity Lottery Licensee" means a holder of an 13adult-use cannabis dispensary license awarded through a 14lottery held under subsection (c) of Section 15-35.20 of this 15Act. 16    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 17Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 18the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 19the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 20top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have 21been awarded a license but for the one or more other 22top-scoring applications that received the same number of 23application points. Each application for which a Dispensary 24Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 25the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 26considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.  HB2343- 24 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 2under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 3Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 415-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 5    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically 6comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 7either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 8cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 9defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 10include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 11of accurately measuring servings.12    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 13organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 14Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 15on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 16college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 17Vocational Training Pilot Program. 18    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 19officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 20organization.21    "Transporting organization agent identification card" 22means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 23identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.24    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 25village, or incorporated town.26    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which   HB2343- 25 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 2plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 3includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 4cannabis plants as follows: 5        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not 6    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 7    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 8    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 9    cannabis plant; or 10        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 11    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to 12    produce cannabis.13(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 14102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 155-13-22.) 16    (410 ILCS 705/7-10)17    Sec. 7-10. Cannabis Business Development Fund. 18    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund, 19which shall be held separate and apart from all other State 20moneys, to be known as the Cannabis Business Development Fund. 21The Cannabis Business Development Fund shall be exclusively 22used for the following purposes:23        (1) to provide low-interest rate loans to Qualified 24    Social Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery 25    Licensees to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to   HB2343- 26 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    start and operate a cannabis business establishment 2    permitted by this Act;3        (2) to provide grants to Qualified Social Equity 4    Applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to 5    start and operate a cannabis business establishment 6    permitted by this Act;7        (3) to compensate the Department of Commerce and 8    Economic Opportunity for any costs related to the 9    provision of low-interest loans and grants to Qualified 10    Social Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery 11    Licensees; 12        (4) to pay for outreach that may be provided or 13    targeted to attract and support Social Equity Applicants, 14    and Qualified Social Equity Applicants, and Social Equity 15    Lottery Licensees;16        (5) to provide financial assistance to support lending 17    to, or private investment in, Qualified Social Equity 18    Applicants and Social Equity Lottery Licensees, or to 19    facilitate access to the facilities needed to commence 20    operations as a cannabis business establishment (blank); 21        (6) to conduct any study or research concerning the 22    participation of minorities, women, veterans, or people 23    with disabilities in the cannabis industry, including, 24    without limitation, barriers to such individuals entering 25    the industry as equity owners of cannabis business 26    establishments;  HB2343- 27 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1        (7) (blank); and2        (8) to assist with job training and technical 3    assistance for residents in Disproportionately Impacted 4    Areas.5    (b) All moneys collected under Sections 15-15 and 15-20 6for Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization Licenses 7issued before January 1, 2021 and remunerations made as a 8result of transfers of permits awarded to Qualified Social 9Equity Applicants shall be deposited into the Cannabis 10Business Development Fund.11    (c) (Blank).12    (c-5) In addition to any other transfers that may be 13provided for by law, on July 1, 2023, or as soon thereafter as 14practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 15Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $40,000,000 from the 16Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis 17Business Development Fund. 18    (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 19Cannabis Business Development Fund is not subject to sweeps, 20administrative charge-backs, or any other fiscal or budgetary 21maneuver that would in any way transfer any amounts from the 22Cannabis Business Development Fund into any other fund of the 23State.24(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 25    (410 ILCS 705/7-15)  HB2343- 28 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    Sec. 7-15. Loans, financial assistance, and grants to 2Qualified Social Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery 3Licensees. 4    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 5shall establish grant, and loan, and financial assistance 6programs, subject to appropriations from the Cannabis Business 7Development Fund, for the purposes of providing financial 8assistance, loans, grants, and technical assistance to 9Qualified Social Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery 10Licensees.11    (b) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12has the power to: 13        (1) provide Cannabis Social Equity loans, financial 14    assistance, and grants from appropriations from the 15    Cannabis Business Development Fund to assist Qualified 16    Social Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery 17    Licensees in gaining entry to, and successfully operating 18    in, the State's regulated cannabis marketplace; 19        (2) enter into agreements that set forth terms and 20    conditions of the financial assistance, accept funds or 21    grants, and engage in cooperation with private entities 22    and agencies of State or local government to carry out the 23    purposes of this Section; 24        (3) fix, determine, charge, and collect any premiums, 25    fees, charges, costs and expenses, including application 26    fees, commitment fees, program fees, financing charges, or   HB2343- 29 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    publication fees in connection with its activities under 2    this Section; 3        (4) coordinate assistance under the financial 4    assistance these loan programs with activities of the 5    Illinois Department of Financial and Professional 6    Regulation, the Illinois Department of Agriculture, and 7    other agencies as needed to maximize the effectiveness and 8    efficiency of this Act; 9        (5) provide staff, administration, and related support 10    required to administer this Section; 11        (6) take whatever actions are necessary or appropriate 12    to protect the State's interest in the event of 13    bankruptcy, default, foreclosure, or noncompliance with 14    the terms and conditions of financial assistance provided 15    under this Section, including the ability to recapture 16    funds if the recipient is found to be noncompliant with 17    the terms and conditions of the financial assistance 18    agreement; 19        (6.5) enter into financial intermediary agreements to 20    facilitate lending to or investment in Qualified Social 21    Equity Applicants, Social Equity Lottery Licensees, or 22    their subsidiaries or affiliates, to ensure the 23    availability of facilities necessary to operate a cannabis 24    business establishment; 25        (7) establish application, notification, contract, and 26    other forms, procedures, or rules deemed necessary and   HB2343- 30 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    appropriate; and2        (8) utilize vendors or contract work to carry out the 3    purposes of this Act.4    (c) Loans made under this Section: 5        (1) shall only be made if, in the Department's 6    judgment, the project furthers the goals set forth in this 7    Act; and 8        (2) shall be in such principal amount and form and 9    contain such terms and provisions with respect to 10    security, insurance, reporting, delinquency charges, 11    default remedies, forgiveness, and other matters as the 12    Department shall determine appropriate to protect the 13    public interest and to be consistent with the purposes of 14    this Section. The terms and provisions may be less than 15    required for similar loans not covered by this Section; 16    and .17        (3) may be distributed by lot if the Department 18    determines that the amount of funding available is 19    insufficient to provide an adequate amount of funding for 20    all of the applicants eligible to receive a loan. The 21    Department may determine the number of loans available 22    based on the amount of funding available and communicate 23    the number of loans available on the loan application. The 24    Department may use competitive criteria to establish which 25    applicants are eligible to receive a grant, loan, or 26    financial assistance.   HB2343- 31 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    (d) Grants made under this Section shall be awarded on a 2competitive and annual basis under the Grant Accountability 3and Transparency Act. Grants made under this Section shall 4further and promote the goals of this Act, including promotion 5of Social Equity Applicants, Qualified Social Equity 6Applicants, or Social Equity Lottery Licensees, job training 7and workforce development, and technical assistance to Social 8Equity Applicants and Social Equity Lottery Licensees. To the 9extent registration with the federal System for Award 10Management requires a grant applicant to certify compliance 11with all federal laws, the grant applicants under this Section 12shall not be required to register for a unique entity 13identifier through the federal System for Award Management to 14be qualified to receive a grant so long as federal law 15prohibits the cultivation and sale of cannabis. 16    (d-5) Financial intermediary agreements to provide 17financial assistance must further the goals set forth in this 18Act and shall result in financing or lease costs that are 19affordable or below market rate. 20    (e) Beginning January 1, 2021 and each year thereafter, 21the Department shall annually report to the Governor and the 22General Assembly on the outcomes and effectiveness of this 23Section that shall include the following: 24        (1) the number of persons or businesses receiving 25    financial assistance under this Section; 26        (2) the amount in financial assistance awarded in the   HB2343- 32 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    aggregate, in addition to the amount of loans made that 2    are outstanding and the amount of grants awarded; 3        (3) the location of the project engaged in by the 4    person or business; and5        (4) if applicable, the number of new jobs and other 6    forms of economic output created as a result of the 7    financial assistance. 8    (f) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9shall include engagement with individuals with limited English 10proficiency as part of its outreach provided or targeted to 11attract and support Social Equity Applicants.12(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 13    (410 ILCS 705/55-30)14    Sec. 55-30. Confidentiality. 15    (a) Information provided by the cannabis business 16establishment licensees or applicants to the Department of 17Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the Department 18of Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity, or other agency shall be 20limited to information necessary for the purposes of 21administering this Act. The information is subject to the 22provisions and limitations contained in the Freedom of 23Information Act and may be disclosed in accordance with 24Section 55-65.25    (b) The following information received and records kept by   HB2343- 33 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Public 2Health, the Illinois State Police, and the Department of 3Financial and Professional Regulation for purposes of 4administering this Article are subject to all applicable 5federal privacy laws, are confidential and exempt from 6disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, except as 7provided in this Act, and not subject to disclosure to any 8individual or public or private entity, except to the 9Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 10Department of Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 12Illinois State Police as necessary to perform official duties 13under this Article and to the Attorney General as necessary to 14enforce the provisions of this Act. The following information 15received and kept by the Department of Financial and 16Professional Regulation or the Department of Agriculture may 17be disclosed to the Department of Public Health, the 18Department of Agriculture, the Department of Revenue, the 19Illinois State Police, the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity, or the Attorney General upon proper request:21        (1) Applications and renewals, their contents, and 22    supporting information submitted by or on behalf of 23    dispensing organizations, cannabis business 24    establishments, or Community College Cannabis Vocational 25    Program licensees, in compliance with this Article, 26    including their physical addresses; however, this does not   HB2343- 34 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1    preclude the release of ownership information about 2    cannabis business establishment licenses, or information 3    submitted with an application required to be disclosed 4    pursuant to subsection (f);5        (2) Any plans, procedures, policies, or other records 6    relating to cannabis business establishment security; and7        (3) Information otherwise exempt from disclosure by 8    State or federal law.9    Illinois or national criminal history record information, 10or the nonexistence or lack of such information, may not be 11disclosed by the Department of Financial and Professional 12Regulation or the Department of Agriculture, except as 13necessary to the Attorney General to enforce this Act. 14    (c) The name and address of a dispensing organization 15licensed under this Act shall be subject to disclosure under 16the Freedom of Information Act. The name and cannabis business 17establishment address of the person or entity holding each 18cannabis business establishment license shall be subject to 19disclosure.20    (d) All information collected by the Department of 21Financial and Professional Regulation or the Department of 22Agriculture in the course of an examination, inspection, or 23investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 24limited to, any complaint against a licensee or applicant 25filed with the Department of Financial and Professional 26Regulation or the Department of Agriculture and information   HB2343- 35 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1collected to investigate any such complaint, shall be 2maintained for the confidential use of the Department of 3Financial and Professional Regulation or the Department of 4Agriculture and shall not be disclosed, except as otherwise 5provided in this Act. A formal complaint against a licensee by 6the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation or the 7Department of Agriculture or any disciplinary order issued by 8the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation or the 9Department of Agriculture against a licensee or applicant 10shall be a public record, except as otherwise provided by law. 11Complaints from consumers or members of the general public 12received regarding a specific, named licensee or complaints 13regarding conduct by unlicensed entities shall be subject to 14disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. 15    (e) The Department of Agriculture, the Illinois State 16Police, and the Department of Financial and Professional 17Regulation shall not share or disclose any Illinois or 18national criminal history record information, or the 19nonexistence or lack of such information, to any person or 20entity not expressly authorized by this Act. 21    (f) Each Department responsible for licensure under this 22Act shall publish on the Department's website a list of the 23ownership information of cannabis business establishment 24licensees under the Department's jurisdiction. The list shall 25include, but is not limited to: the name of the person or 26entity holding each cannabis business establishment license;   HB2343- 36 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1and the address at which the entity is operating under this 2Act. This list shall be published and updated monthly.3    (g) Notwithstanding anything in this Section to the 4contrary, the Department of Financial and Professional 5Regulation and the Department of Agriculture may share with 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity any 7licensee information necessary to support the administration 8of social equity programming. 9(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 10102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 115-13-22.)  HB2343- 37 -LRB104 03587 BDA 13611 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    410 ILCS 130/1454    410 ILCS 705/1-105    410 ILCS 705/7-106    410 ILCS 705/7-157    410 ILCS 705/55-30